Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-612
Bus, defined.

Bus shall mean every motor vehicle designed for carrying more than ten passengers and used for the transportation of persons and every motor vehicle, other than a taxicab, designed and used for the transportation of persons for compensation.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 108.